Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.140

Peremptory challenges defined.

A peremptory challenge is an objection to a juror for which no reason need be given, but upon which the court shall exclude the juror.

[ 2003 c 406 s 5; Code 1881 s 208; 1877 p 43 s 212; 1869 p 51 s 212; RRS s 325.]